Tennessee, session 114, SB2531.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Title 41, Chapter 1, is amended by adding
the following as a new part:
41-1-301. Part definitions.
As used in this part:
(1) "Board" means the state family advisory board;
(2) "Department" means the department of correction; and
(3) "Family member" means a grandparent, parent, sibling, spouse or
domestic partner, child, aunt, uncle, cousin, niece, nephew, grandchild, or
another person related to an individual by blood, adoption, marriage, or a
fostering relationship.
41-1-302. State family advisory board established – Board composition – Initial
appointments – Removal of members.
(a) There is created the state family advisory board.
(b)
(1) The board is composed of nine (9) members who must all be family
members of individuals currently incarcerated in this state.
(2) The members must be appointed by the governor, the speaker of the
senate, and the speaker of the house of representatives as follows:
(A) Three (3) members of the board must be appointed by the
governor;
SB2531
012274
- 1 -

(B) Three (3) members of the board must be appointed by the
speaker of the senate; and
(C) Three (3) members of the board must be appointed by the
speaker of the house.
(3) The appointing authorities in subdivision (b)(2) shall appoint one (1)
member from each grand division in this state.
(c)
(1) In making the initial appointments under this section:
(A) The speaker of the senate shall appoint one (1) member to a
term expiring on January 1, 2030; one (1) member to a term expiring on
January 1, 2029; and one (1) member to a term expiring on January 1,
2028;
(B) The speaker of the house of representatives shall appoint one
(1) member to a term expiring on January 1, 2030; one (1) member to a
term expiring on January 1, 2029; and one (1) member to a term expiring
on January 1, 2028; and
(C) The governor shall appoint one (1) member to a term expiring
on January 1, 2030; one (1) member to a term expiring on January 1,
2029; and one (1) member to a term expiring on January 1, 2028.
(2) Following the expiration of initial terms under subdivisions (c)(1)(A)-
(C), all members shall serve three-year terms that begin on January 1 and end
on December 31 of each applicable year.
(3) Members of the board are eligible for reappointment.
(d)
- 2 - 012274

(1) Vacancies occurring on the board before the expiration of a term by
reason of death, resignation, removal, or another reason must be filled in the
same manner as the regular appointment for the remainder of the unexpired
term.
(2) An appointed member of the board serves in such capacity until the
expiration of the term to which the member was appointed and until the
member's successor is duly appointed and qualified.
(e) The governor and the speakers of the senate and house of representatives
may remove a member of the board whom the respective appointing authority appointed
for cause.
(f) The members of the board shall elect one (1) member of the board to serve
as the chair for a term of one (1) year beginning January 1 of the appropriate year. The
chair shall direct the operation of the board and shall fulfill the functions established by
statute, unless duties and responsibilities are otherwise assigned under this part. The
board may designate one (1) of its members to act as chair during the absence or
incapacity of the chair, and when so acting, the member so designated has and
performs all the powers and duties of the chair of the board.
41-1-303. Power and authority of the board.
The board shall:
(1) Foster effective communication between the department and family
members;
(2) Strengthen efforts for family reunification;
(3) Build stronger families and communities upon reentry; and
(4) Provide feedback on relevant activities within the department.
41-1-304. Board meetings – Quorum of members – Reimbursement for travel.
- 3 - 012274

(a)
(1) The commissioner of correction shall call the first meeting of the
board.
(2) The board shall meet at least monthly at a time and place prescribed
by the board.
(3) In addition to the regular meetings of the board, the board shall hold
at least three (3) public informational meetings each year for family members and
the public to provide comments. These meetings must not be held in the same
grand division.
(b) The board must take all votes by public ballot or public roll call. Secret
ballots or secret roll calls are not permitted.
(c) A majority of members of the board constitutes a quorum for official
administrative business.
(d) Members of the board serve without compensation; however, the members
of the board must be reimbursed for reasonable and necessary travel expenses in
accordance with the state comprehensive travel regulations when engaging in the
board's business.
41-1-305. Cooperation with the board.
The department shall provide staffing as necessary for the board to fulfill its duties under
this part.
SECTION 2. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 4-29-249(a), is amended by inserting
the following as a new subdivision:
( ) State family advisory board, created by § 41-1-302;
- 4 - 012274

SECTION 3. The headings to sections in this act are for reference purposes only and do
not constitute a part of the law enacted by this act. However, the Tennessee Code Commission
is requested to include the headings in any compilation or publication containing this act.
SECTION 4. This act takes effect July 1, 2026, the public welfare requiring it.
- 5 - 012274